Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202283-101.14
Deaf or hard of hearing persons; access to treatment programs; rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services with the assistance of the Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to define criteria and standards for access by eligible deaf or hard of hearing persons to mental health, alcoholism, and drug abuse treatment programs.

Laws 1995, LB 25, § 9;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 895;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 26;

Laws 2019, LB248, § 7.